Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; STATE PATROL.new text end new text begin $7,200,000 in fiscal year 2025, $2,900,000 in fiscal year 2026, and $2,900,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of public safety for staff and equipment costs of additional State Patrol troopers. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end